Indiana, session 2026, HB1072.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 24-5-0.5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.104-2024,
SECTION 42, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) A supplier may not commit an unfair,
abusive, or deceptive act, omission, or practice in connection with a
consumer transaction. Such an act, omission, or practice by a supplier
is a violation of this chapter whether it occurs before, during, or after
the transaction. An act, omission, or practice prohibited by this section
includes both implicit and explicit misrepresentations.
(b) Without limiting the scope of subsection (a), the following acts,
and the following representations as to the subject matter of a
consumer transaction, made orally, in writing, or by electronic
communication, by a supplier, are deceptive acts:
(1) That such subject of a consumer transaction has sponsorship,
approval, performance, characteristics, accessories, uses, or
benefits it does not have which the supplier knows or should
reasonably know it does not have.
(2) That such subject of a consumer transaction is of a particular
2026 IN 1072—LS 6467/DI 153


standard, quality, grade, style, or model, if it is not and if the
supplier knows or should reasonably know that it is not.
(3) That such subject of a consumer transaction is new or unused,
if it is not and if the supplier knows or should reasonably know
that it is not.
(4) That such subject of a consumer transaction will be supplied
to the public in greater quantity than the supplier intends or
reasonably expects.
(5) That replacement or repair constituting the subject of a
consumer transaction is needed, if it is not and if the supplier
knows or should reasonably know that it is not.
(6) That a specific price advantage exists as to such subject of a
consumer transaction, if it does not and if the supplier knows or
should reasonably know that it does not.
(7) That the supplier has a sponsorship, approval, or affiliation in
such consumer transaction the supplier does not have, and which
the supplier knows or should reasonably know that the supplier
does not have.
(8) That such consumer transaction involves or does not involve
a warranty, a disclaimer of warranties, or other rights, remedies,
or obligations, if the representation is false and if the supplier
knows or should reasonably know that the representation is false.
(9) That the consumer will receive a rebate, discount, or other
benefit as an inducement for entering into a sale or lease in return
for giving the supplier the names of prospective consumers or
otherwise helping the supplier to enter into other consumer
transactions, if earning the benefit, rebate, or discount is
contingent upon the occurrence of an event subsequent to the time
the consumer agrees to the purchase or lease.
(10) That the supplier is able to deliver or complete the subject of
the consumer transaction within a stated period of time, when the
supplier knows or should reasonably know the supplier could not.
If no time period has been stated by the supplier, there is a
presumption that the supplier has represented that the supplier
will deliver or complete the subject of the consumer transaction
within a reasonable time, according to the course of dealing or the
usage of the trade.
(11) That the consumer will be able to purchase the subject of the
consumer transaction as advertised by the supplier, if the supplier
does not intend to sell it.
(12) That the replacement or repair constituting the subject of a
consumer transaction can be made by the supplier for the estimate
2026 IN 1072—LS 6467/DI 153


the supplier gives a customer for the replacement or repair, if the
specified work is completed and:
(A) the cost exceeds the estimate by an amount equal to or
greater than ten percent (10%) of the estimate;
(B) the supplier did not obtain written permission from the
customer to authorize the supplier to complete the work even
if the cost would exceed the amounts specified in clause (A);
(C) the total cost for services and parts for a single transaction
is more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750); and
(D) the supplier knew or reasonably should have known that
the cost would exceed the estimate in the amounts specified in
clause (A).
(13) That the replacement or repair constituting the subject of a
consumer transaction is needed, and that the supplier disposes of
the part repaired or replaced earlier than seventy-two (72) hours
after both:
(A) the customer has been notified that the work has been
completed; and
(B) the part repaired or replaced has been made available for
examination upon the request of the customer.
(14) Engaging in the replacement or repair of the subject of a
consumer transaction if the consumer has not authorized the
replacement or repair, and if the supplier knows or should
reasonably know that it is not authorized.
(15) The act of misrepresenting the geographic location of the
supplier by listing an alternate business name or an assumed
business name (as described in IC 23-0.5-3-4) in a local telephone
directory if:
(A) the name misrepresents the supplier's geographic location;
(B) the listing fails to identify the locality and state of the
supplier's business;
(C) calls to the local telephone number are routinely forwarded
or otherwise transferred to a supplier's business location that
is outside the calling area covered by the local telephone
directory; and
(D) the supplier's business location is located in a county that
is not contiguous to a county in the calling area covered by the
local telephone directory.
(16) The act of listing an alternate business name or assumed
business name (as described in IC 23-0.5-3-4) in a directory
assistance data base if:
(A) the name misrepresents the supplier's geographic location;
2026 IN 1072—LS 6467/DI 153


(B) calls to the local telephone number are routinely forwarded
or otherwise transferred to a supplier's business location that
is outside the local calling area; and
(C) the supplier's business location is located in a county that
is not contiguous to a county in the local calling area.
(17) The violation by a supplier of IC 24-3-4 concerning
cigarettes for import or export.
(18) The act of a supplier in knowingly selling or reselling a
product to a consumer if the product has been recalled, whether
by the order of a court or a regulatory body, or voluntarily by the
manufacturer, distributor, or retailer, unless the product has been
repaired or modified to correct the defect that was the subject of
the recall.
(19) The violation by a supplier of 47 U.S.C. 227, including any
rules or regulations issued under 47 U.S.C. 227.
(20) The violation by a supplier of the federal Fair Debt
Collection Practices Act (15 U.S.C. 1692 et seq.), including any
rules or regulations issued under the federal Fair Debt Collection
Practices Act (15 U.S.C. 1692 et seq.).
(21) A violation of IC 24-5-7 (concerning health spa services), as
set forth in IC 24-5-7-17.
(22) A violation of IC 24-5-8 (concerning business opportunity
transactions), as set forth in IC 24-5-8-20.
(23) A violation of IC 24-5-10 (concerning home consumer
transactions), as set forth in IC 24-5-10-18.
(24) A violation of IC 24-5-11 (concerning real property
improvement contracts), as set forth in IC 24-5-11-14.
(25) A violation of IC 24-5-12 (concerning telephone
solicitations), as set forth in IC 24-5-12-23.
(26) A violation of IC 24-5-13.5 (concerning buyback motor
vehicles), as set forth in IC 24-5-13.5-14.
(27) A violation of IC 24-5-14 (concerning automatic
dialing-announcing devices), as set forth in IC 24-5-14-13.
(28) A violation of IC 24-5-15 (concerning credit services
organizations), as set forth in IC 24-5-15-11.
(29) A violation of IC 24-5-16 (concerning unlawful motor
vehicle subleasing), as set forth in IC 24-5-16-18.
(30) A violation of IC 24-5-17 (concerning environmental
marketing claims), as set forth in IC 24-5-17-14.
(31) A violation of IC 24-5-19 (concerning deceptive commercial
solicitation), as set forth in IC 24-5-19-11.
(32) A violation of IC 24-5-21 (concerning prescription drug
2026 IN 1072—LS 6467/DI 153


discount cards), as set forth in IC 24-5-21-7.
(33) A violation of IC 24-5-23.5-7 (concerning real estate
appraisals), as set forth in IC 24-5-23.5-9.
(34) A violation of IC 24-5-26 (concerning identity theft), as set
forth in IC 24-5-26-3.
(35) A violation of IC 24-5.5 (concerning mortgage rescue fraud),
as set forth in IC 24-5.5-6-1.
(36) A violation of IC 24-8 (concerning promotional gifts and
contests), as set forth in IC 24-8-6-3.
(37) A violation of IC 21-18.5-6 (concerning representations
made by a postsecondary credit bearing proprietary educational
institution), as set forth in IC 21-18.5-6-22.5.
(38) A violation of IC 24-5-15.5 (concerning collection actions of
a plaintiff debt buyer), as set forth in IC 24-5-15.5-6.
(39) A violation of IC 24-14 (concerning towing services), as set
forth in IC 24-14-10-1.
(40) A violation of IC 24-5-14.5 (concerning misleading or
inaccurate caller identification information), as set forth in
IC 24-5-14.5-12.
(41) A violation of IC 24-5-27 (concerning intrastate inmate
calling services), as set forth in IC 24-5-27-27.
(42) A violation of IC 15-21 (concerning sales of dogs by retail
pet stores), as set forth in IC 15-21-7-4.
(43) A violation of IC 24-4-23 (concerning the security of
information collected and transmitted by an adult oriented website
operator), as set forth in IC 24-4-23-14.
(44) A violation of IC 29-2-16.1 (concerning anatomical gifts),
as set forth in IC 29-2-16.1-24.
(c) Any representations on or within a product or its packaging or
in advertising or promotional materials which would constitute a
deceptive act shall be the deceptive act both of the supplier who places
such representation thereon or therein, or who authored such materials,
and such other suppliers who shall state orally or in writing that such
representation is true if such other supplier shall know or have reason
to know that such representation was false.
(d) If a supplier shows by a preponderance of the evidence that an
act resulted from a bona fide error notwithstanding the maintenance of
procedures reasonably adopted to avoid the error, such act shall not be
deceptive within the meaning of this chapter.
(e) It shall be a defense to any action brought under this chapter that
the representation constituting an alleged deceptive act was one made
in good faith by the supplier without knowledge of its falsity and in
2026 IN 1072—LS 6467/DI 153


reliance upon the oral or written representations of the manufacturer,
the person from whom the supplier acquired the product, any testing
organization, or any other person provided that the source thereof is
disclosed to the consumer.
(f) For purposes of subsection (b)(12), a supplier that provides
estimates before performing repair or replacement work for a customer
shall give the customer a written estimate itemizing as closely as
possible the price for labor and parts necessary for the specific job
before commencing the work.
(g) For purposes of subsection (b)(15) and (b)(16), a telephone
company or other provider of a telephone directory or directory
assistance service or its officer or agent is immune from liability for
publishing the listing of an alternate business name or assumed
business name of a supplier in its directory or directory assistance data
base unless the telephone company or other provider of a telephone
directory or directory assistance service is the same person as the
supplier who has committed the deceptive act.
(h) For purposes of subsection (b)(18), it is an affirmative defense
to any action brought under this chapter that the product has been
altered by a person other than the defendant to render the product
completely incapable of serving its original purpose.
SECTION 2. IC 25-15-9-20 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 20. (a) A procurement organization (as defined in
IC 29-2-16.1-1) or an entity controlled by a procurement
organization may not:
(1) obtain or operate under a funeral home or branch location
license issued under this article; or
(2) obtain or operate under a crematory registration under
IC 23-14-31.
(b) A procurement organization may not select or recommend
a specific licensed funeral provider for a donor family, except to
provide a neutral, rotating list of geographically relevant providers
created in cooperation with the board.
(c) The board may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to implement
this section.
SECTION 3. IC 29-2-16.1-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.50-2021,
SECTION 68, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. The following definitions apply throughout this
chapter:
(1) "Adult" means an individual at least eighteen (18) years of
age.
2026 IN 1072—LS 6467/DI 153


(2) "Agent" means an individual who is:
(A) authorized to make health care decisions on behalf of
another person by a health care power of attorney under
IC 30-5-5-16 or a health care representative under IC 16-36-7;
or
(B) expressly authorized to make an anatomical gift on behalf
of another person by a document signed by the person.
(3) "Anatomical gift" means a donation of all or part of a human
body to take effect after the donor's death for the purpose of
transplantation, therapy, research, or education.
(4) "Bank" or "storage facility" means a facility licensed,
accredited, or approved under the laws of any state for storage of
human bodies or parts of human bodies.
(5) "Decedent":
(A) means a deceased individual whose body or body part is
or may be the source of an anatomical gift; and
(B) includes:
(i) a stillborn infant; and
(ii) except as restricted by any other law, a fetus.
(6) "Disinterested witness" means an individual other than a
spouse, child, sibling, grandchild, grandparent, or guardian of the
individual who makes, amends, revokes, or refuses to make an
anatomical gift or another adult who exhibited special care and
concern for the individual. This term does not include a person to
whom an anatomical gift could pass under section 10 of this
chapter.
(7) "Document of gift" means a donor card or other record used
to make an anatomical gift, including a statement or symbol on:
(A) a driver's license;
(B) an identification card;
(C) a resident license to hunt, fish, or trap; or
(D) a donor registry.
(8) "Donor" means an individual whose body or body part is the
subject of an anatomical gift.
(9) "Donor registry" means:
(A) a data base maintained by:
(i) the bureau of motor vehicles; or
(ii) the equivalent agency in another state;
(B) the Donate Life Indiana Registry maintained by the
Indiana Donation Alliance Foundation; or
(C) a donor registry maintained in another state;
that contains records of anatomical gifts and amendments to or
2026 IN 1072—LS 6467/DI 153


revocations of anatomical gifts.
(10) "Driver's license" means a license or permit issued by the
bureau of motor vehicles to operate a vehicle.
(11) "Eye bank" means a person that is licensed, accredited, or
regulated under federal or state law to engage in the recovery,
screening, testing, processing, storage, or distribution of human
eyes or portions of human eyes.
(12) "Guardian" means an individual appointed by a court to
make decisions regarding the support, care, education, health, or
welfare of an individual. The term does not include a guardian ad
litem.
(13) "Hospital" means a facility licensed as a hospital under the
laws of any state or a facility operated as a hospital by the United
States, a state, or a subdivision of a state.
(14) "Identification card" means an identification card issued by
the bureau of motor vehicles.
(15) "Licensed funeral provider" means a:
(A) funeral home or funeral home branch licensed under
IC 25-15; or
(B) crematory registered under IC 23-14-31.
(16) "Local health department" means a local health
department established under IC 16-20.
(15) (17) "Minor" means an individual under eighteen (18) years
of age.
(16) (18) "Organ procurement organization" means a person
designated by the Secretary of the United States Department of
Health and Human Services as an organ procurement
organization.
(17) (19) "Parent" means an individual whose parental rights have
not been terminated.
(18) (20) "Part" means an organ, an eye, or tissue of a human
being. The term does not mean a whole body.
(19) (21) "Pathologist" means a physician:
(A) certified by the American Board of Pathology; or
(B) holding an unlimited license to practice medicine in
Indiana and acting under the direction of a physician certified
by the American Board of Pathology.
(20) (22) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business
trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company,
association, joint venture, public corporation, government or
governmental subdivision, agency, instrumentality, or any other
legal or commercial entity.
2026 IN 1072—LS 6467/DI 153


(21) (23) "Physician" or "surgeon" means an individual authorized
to practice medicine or osteopathy under the laws of any state.
(22) (24) "Procurement organization" means an eye bank, organ
procurement organization, or tissue bank.
(23) (25) "Prospective donor" means an individual who is dead or
near death and has been determined by a procurement
organization to have a part that could be medically suitable for
transplantation, therapy, research, or education. The term does not
include an individual who has made an appropriate refusal.
(24) (26) "Reasonably available" means:
(A) able to be contacted by a procurement organization
without undue effort; and
(B) willing and able to act in a timely manner consistent with
existing medical criteria necessary for the making of an
anatomical gift.
(25) (27) "Recipient" means an individual into whose body a
decedent's part has been or is intended to be transplanted.
(26) (28) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a
tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium
and is retrievable in perceivable form.
(27) (29) "Refusal" means a record created under section 6 of this
chapter that expressly states the intent to bar another person from
making an anatomical gift of an individual's body or part.
(28) (30) "Sign" means, with the present intent to authenticate or
adopt a record:
(A) to execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or
(B) to attach to or logically associate with the record an
electronic symbol, sound, or process.
(29) (31) "State" means a state of the United States, the District
of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any
territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the
United States.
(30) (32) "Technician" means an individual determined to be
qualified to remove or process parts by an appropriate
organization that is licensed, accredited, or regulated under
federal or state law. The term includes an eye enucleator.
(31) (33) "Tissue" means a part of the human body other than an
organ or an eye. The term does not include blood or other bodily
fluids unless the blood or bodily fluids are donated for the
purpose of research or education.
(32) (34) "Tissue bank" means a person that is licensed,
accredited, or regulated under federal or state law to engage in the
2026 IN 1072—LS 6467/DI 153


recovery, screening, testing, processing, storage, or distribution of
tissue.
(33) (35) "Transplant hospital" means a hospital that furnishes
organ transplants and other medical and surgical specialty
services required for the care of organ transplant patients.
SECTION 4. IC 29-2-16.1-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.26-2021,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) Subject to subsections (b) and (c), unless
barred by section 6 or 7 of this chapter, an anatomical gift of a
decedent's body or part for the purpose of transplantation, therapy,
research, or education may be made by any member of the following
classes of persons who are reasonably available, in the order of priority
listed:
(1) An agent of the decedent at the time of death who could have
made an anatomical gift under section 3(2) of this chapter
immediately before the decedent's death.
(2) The spouse of the decedent.
(3) Adult children of the decedent.
(4) Parents of the decedent.
(5) Adult siblings of the decedent.
(6) A guardian appointed by a court under IC 29-3-5-3.
(7) Adult grandchildren of the decedent.
(8) Grandparents of the decedent.
(9) An adult who exhibited special care and concern for the
decedent.
(10) Any other person having the authority to dispose of the
decedent's body.
(a) Except as provided in subsections (b) and (d), and unless
barred by section 6 or 7 of this chapter, the following persons, in
the priority indicated, have the authority to make an anatomical
gift with respect to a decedent, including the manner, purpose, and
scope of the anatomical gift:
(1) A person:
(A) granted the authority to serve in a funeral planning
declaration executed by the decedent under IC 29-2-19; or
(B) named in a United States Department of Defense form
"Record of Emergency Data" (DD Form 93) or a successor
form adopted by the United States Department of Defense,
if the decedent died while serving in any branch of the
United States Armed Forces (as defined in 10 U.S.C. 101)
and completed the form.
(2) An agent of the decedent.
2026 IN 1072—LS 6467/DI 153


(3) The individual who was the spouse of the decedent at the
time of the decedent's death, except when:
(A) a petition to dissolve the marriage or for legal
separation of the decedent and spouse is pending with a
court at the time of the decedent's death, unless a court
finds that the decedent and spouse were reconciled before
the decedent's death; or
(B) a court determines the decedent and spouse were
physically and emotionally separated at the time of death
and the separation was for an extended time that clearly
demonstrates an absence of due affection, trust, and regard
for the decedent.
(4) The decedent's surviving adult child or, if more than one
(1) adult child is surviving, the majority of the adult children.
However, a minority of the adult children have the rights
under this subdivision if:
(A) the minority has used reasonable efforts to notify the
other adult children of their intentions to make an
anatomical gift; and
(B) less than half of the other adult children express
opposition.
(5) The decedent's surviving parent or parents. If one (1) of
the parents is absent, the parent who is present has the rights
under this subdivision if the parent who is present has used
reasonable efforts to notify the absent parent.
(6) The decedent's surviving sibling or, if more than one (1)
sibling is surviving, the majority of the surviving siblings.
However, a minority of the siblings have the rights under this
subdivision if:
(A) the minority has used reasonable efforts to notify the
other siblings of their intentions to make an anatomical
gift; and
(B) less than half of the other siblings express opposition.
(7) A guardian appointed by a court under IC 29-3-5-3.
(8) The individual in the next degree of kinship under
IC 29-1-2-1 to inherit the estate of the decedent or, if more
than one (1) individual of the same degree survives, the
majority of those who are of the same degree of kinship.
However, a minority of the individuals who are of the same
degree of kinship have the rights under this subdivision if:
(A) the minority has used reasonable efforts to notify the
other individuals who are of the same degree of kinship of
2026 IN 1072—LS 6467/DI 153


their intentions to make an anatomical gift; and
(B) less than half of the other individuals who are of the
same degree of kinship express opposition.
(9) If no other person has exercised rights under this
subsection, a stepchild (as defined in IC 6-4.1-1-3(f)) of the
decedent, or if more than one (1) stepchild survives the
decedent, the majority of the stepchildren. However, a
minority of the stepchildren have the rights under this
subdivision if:
(A) the minority has used reasonable efforts to notify the
other stepchildren of their intentions to make an
anatomical gift; and
(B) less than half of the stepchildren express opposition.
(10) The person appointed to administer the decedent's estate
under IC 29-1.
(11) If no other person has exercised rights under this
subsection, a funeral home that:
(A) has a valid prepaid funeral plan executed under
IC 30-2-13 that makes arrangements for the making of an
anatomical gift; and
(B) attests in writing that a good faith effort has been made
to contact any living persons described in subdivisions (1)
through (10).
(12) In the case of an indigent or other individual whose final
disposition is the responsibility of the state or township, the
following:
(A) If none of the persons identified in subdivisions (1)
through (11) is available:
(i) a public administrator, including a responsible
township trustee or the trustee's designee; or
(ii) the coroner.
(B) A state appointed guardian.
(b) If there is more than one (1) member of a class listed in
subsection (a)(1), (a)(3), (a)(4), (a)(5), (a)(6), (a)(7), or (a)(8) entitled
to make an anatomical gift, an anatomical gift may be made by a
member of the class unless that member or a person to whom the gift
may pass under section 10 of this chapter knows of an objection by
another member of the class. If an objection is known, the gift may be
made only by a majority of the members of the class who are
reasonably available.
(b) If:
(1) the death of the decedent appears to have been the result
2026 IN 1072—LS 6467/DI 153


of:
(A) murder (IC 35-42-1-1);
(B) voluntary manslaughter (IC 35-42-1-3); or
(C) another criminal act, if the death does not result from
the operation of a vehicle; and
(2) the coroner, in consultation with the law enforcement
agency investigating the death of the decedent, determines
that there is a reasonable suspicion that a person described in
subsection (a) committed the offense;
the person referred to in subdivision (2) has no rights under
subsection (a) with respect to the decedent.
(c) A person may not make an anatomical gift if, at the time of the
decedent's death, a person in a prior class under subsection (a) is
reasonably available to make or to object to the making of an
anatomical gift.
(c) The coroner, in consultation with the law enforcement
agency investigating the death of the decedent, shall inform the
cemetery owner or crematory authority of the determination under
subsection (b)(2).
(d) If:
(1) the decedent had filed a protection order against a person
described in subsection (a); and
(2) the protection order is currently in effect;
the person has no rights under subsection (a).
(e) A law enforcement agency shall determine if the protection
order is in effect. If the law enforcement agency cannot determine
the existence of a protection order that is in effect, the law
enforcement agency shall consult the protective order registry
established by IC 5-2-9-5.5.
(f) If a person vested with rights under subsection (a) does not
exercise the rights not later than seventy-two (72) hours after the
person receives notification of the death of the decedent, the rights
are forfeited and pass to the next person described in subsection
(a). However, this subsection does not affect section 9(b) of this
chapter.
(g) A funeral home has the right to rely, in good faith, on the
representations of a person listed in subsection (a) that any other
individuals of the same degree of kinship have been notified of the
intention to make an anatomical gift.
(h) If there is a dispute concerning the making of an anatomical
gift, a funeral home is not liable for refusing to accept the remains
of the decedent until the funeral home receives:
2026 IN 1072—LS 6467/DI 153


(1) a court order; or
(2) a written agreement signed by the disputing parties;
that determines the final disposition of the decedent's remains. If
a funeral home agrees to shelter the remains of the decedent while
the parties are in dispute, the funeral home may collect any
applicable fees for storing the remains, including legal fees that are
incurred.
(i) Any cause of action filed under this section must be filed in
the probate court in the county where the decedent resided, unless
the decedent was not a resident of Indiana.
(j) A spouse seeking a judicial determination under subsection
(a)(3)(A) that the decedent and spouse were reconciled before the
decedent's death may petition the court having jurisdiction over
the dissolution or separation proceeding to make this
determination by filing the petition under the same cause number
as the dissolution or separation proceeding. A spouse who files a
petition under this subsection is not required to pay a filing fee.
SECTION 5. IC 29-2-16.1-9, AS ADDED BY P.L.147-2007,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) A person authorized to make an anatomical
gift under section 8 of this chapter may make an anatomical gift by a
document or may make an anatomical gift by a document of gift signed
by the person making the gift or by that person's oral communication
that is electronically recorded or is contemporaneously reduced to a
record and signed by the individual receiving the oral communication.
(b) Subject to subsection (c), an anatomical gift by a person
authorized under section 8 of this chapter may be amended or revoked
orally or in a record by any member of a prior class who is reasonably
available. If more than one (1) member of the prior class is reasonably
available, the gift made by a person authorized under section 8 of this
chapter may be:
(1) amended only if a majority of the reasonably available
members agree to the amending of the gift; or
(2) revoked only if a majority of the reasonably available
members agree to the revoking of the gift or if they are equally
divided as to whether to revoke the gift.
(c) A revocation under subsection (b) is effective only if, before an
incision has been made to remove a part from the donor's body or
before invasive procedures have begun to prepare the recipient, the
procurement organization, transplant hospital, or physician or
technician knows of the revocation.
(d) A person authorized to make an anatomical gift under
2026 IN 1072—LS 6467/DI 153


section 8 of this chapter may petition a court with probate
jurisdiction in the county where the remains of the individual who
is the subject of the petition are located, or the county in which the
individual died, to invalidate an anatomical gift if:
(1) the gift is evidenced solely by an indication on a driver's
license or identification card under IC 9-24-17 or by an entry
in a donor registry;
(2) the person has priority; and
(3) a written objection is communicated to the procurement
organization before recovery commences.
(e) A petition under subsection (d) fails if:
(1) a majority of the reasonably available members of the
same priority class listed in section 8 of this chapter oppose
the objection; or
(2) the donor made the gift through another method described
in section 4 of this chapter.
(f) After considering the petition filed under subsection (d), the
court with probate jurisdiction shall issue an order that does one
(1) of the following:
(1) Invalidates the anatomical gift if the court with probate
jurisdiction determines that the criteria in subsection (d) are
met.
(2) Requires the anatomical gift to be recovered if the
conditions in subsection (e) are met.
(g) The court with probate jurisdiction may modify or waive
notice and a hearing if the court determines that a delay would
have a serious adverse effect on:
(1) the medical viability of the individual; or
(2) the viability of the individual's anatomical gift of an organ,
tissue, or an eye.
SECTION 6. IC 29-2-16.1-11.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11.5. (a) Except as provided in
subsection (b), before removing human remains from the place of
death, a procurement organization shall notify a licensed funeral
provider selected by the person with the right of disposition under
IC 23-14-31-26, IC 23-14-55-2, IC 25-15-9-18, or IC 29-2-19-17 of
the procurement organization's intent to remove the human
remains.
(b) A procurement organization may remove human remains
from the place of death without following subsection (a) if
providing notice would jeopardize organ viability.
2026 IN 1072—LS 6467/DI 153


SECTION 7. IC 29-2-16.1-11.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11.7. (a) When seeking
authorization for an anatomical gift from a person authorized to
make an anatomical gift under this chapter, a procurement
organization shall make a clear and conspicuous oral or written
disclosure that includes the following:
(1) An explanation of the difference between organ donation
and tissue or eye donation, including common tissues
recovered.
(2) A statement that tissues may be transferred to or
processed by third party for profit or nonprofit entities, which
may receive revenue or other consideration.
(3) A statement that the procurement organization may
receive compensation or cost recovery related to the transfers
described in subdivision (2).
(4) A description of how making an anatomical gift can
impact the release of remains, embalming, cremation, or
viewing.
(b) The disclosure described in subsection (a) must be
acknowledged by the person authorized to make an anatomical gift
under this chapter and, if the disclosure was made orally, the
disclosure must be memorialized by the procurement organization.
(c) Not later than July 1, 2027, the Indiana department of health
shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 establishing minimum standards
for disclosure under this section.
SECTION 8. IC 29-2-16.1-17, AS AMENDED BY P.L.26-2021,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17. (a) A person who acts in accordance with this
chapter is not liable for the act in a civil action or administrative
proceeding.
(b) Neither the person making an anatomical gift nor the donor's
estate is liable for any injury or damage that results from the making or
use of the gift.
(c) In determining whether an anatomical gift has been made,
amended, or revoked under this chapter, a person may rely upon
representations of an individual listed in section 8(a)(2), 8(a)(3),
8(a)(4), 8(a)(5), 8(a)(7), 8(a)(6), or 8(a)(8) or 8(a)(9) of this chapter
relating to the individual's relationship to the donor or prospective
donor unless the person knows that the representation is untrue.
(d) A health care provider is immune from civil liability for
following a donor's unrevoked anatomical gift directive under this
2026 IN 1072—LS 6467/DI 153


chapter or IC 9-24-17.
(e) A hospital or a recovery agency is immune from civil liability for
determining in good faith and in compliance with this section that:
(1) an individual made a written anatomical gift; or
(2) an individual subsequently made a written revocation of an
anatomical gift.
(f) A person who, in good faith reliance upon a will, card, or other
document of gift, and without actual notice of the amendment,
revocation, or invalidity of the will, card, or document:
(1) takes possession of a decedent's body or performs or causes to
be performed surgical operations upon a decedent's body; or
(2) removes or causes to be removed organs, tissues, or other
parts from a decedent's body;
is not liable in damages in any civil action brought against the donor
for that act.
SECTION 9. IC 29-2-16.1-18, AS ADDED BY P.L.147-2007,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 18. (a) Except as provided in section 9 of this
chapter, a document of gift is valid if executed in accordance with:
(1) this chapter;
(2) the laws of the state or country where it was executed; or
(3) the laws of the state or country where the person making the
anatomical gift was domiciled, has a place of residence, or was a
national at the time the document of gift was executed.
(b) If a document of gift is valid under this chapter, the law of this
state governs the interpretation of the document of gift.
(c) A person may presume that a document of gift or amendment of
an anatomical gift is valid unless that person knows that it was not
validly executed or was revoked.
SECTION 10. IC 29-2-16.1-22 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 22. (a) Except as provided in
subsection (c), a procurement organization may not remove or
transport human remains outside of Indiana for evaluation or
recovery without first notifying:
(1) the licensed funeral provider selected by the person with
the right of disposition under IC 23-14-31-26, IC 23-14-55-2,
IC 25-15-9-18, or IC 29-2-19-17; and
(2) the local health department of the county where the death
occurred;
of the procurement organization's intent to remove or transport
the human remains.
2026 IN 1072—LS 6467/DI 153


(b) Notice under subsection (a):
(1) must include:
(A) the location where the procurement organization
intends to take the human remains; and
(B) the expected date and time of transport; and
(2) may be delivered electronically.
(c) Subsection (a) does not apply to the transport of organs or
tissues separate from the remainder of the human body after a
lawful recovery.
SECTION 11. IC 29-2-16.1-23 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 23. (a) Not later than April 1 of
each year, a procurement organization operating in Indiana shall
publish a public report that discloses the following with respect to
the previous calendar year:
(1) Aggregate counts of organ, tissue, and eye donations
recovered from Indiana decedents.
(2) Aggregate revenues and expenses associated with:
(A) organ recovery; and
(B) tissue or eye recovery.
The information described in clause (A) must be reported
separately from the information described in clause (B).
(3) A list of third party entities to which tissues were
transferred for processing or distribution, identified by
organization type (for profit or nonprofit).
(b) The report required by this section must protect the
confidentiality of individually identifiable health information
under state and federal law.
(c) A procurement organization shall do the following with
respect to a report required by this section:
(1) Post the report on the procurement organization's public
website.
(2) File the report with the Indiana department of health.
SECTION 12. IC 29-2-16.1-24 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 24. A procurement organization
that violates:
(1) section 11.5 of this chapter;
(2) section 11.7 of this chapter;
(3) section 22 of this chapter; or
(4) section 23 of this chapter;
commits a deceptive act that is actionable under IC 24-5-0.5 and
2026 IN 1072—LS 6467/DI 153


subject to the remedies and penalties under IC 24-5-0.5.
2026 IN 1072—LS 6467/DI 153